Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-215
Military supplies; production; distribution; discrimination prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, engaged to any extent whatsoever in the State of Nebraska in the production, manufacture, or distribution of military or naval material, equipment, or supplies for the State of Nebraska or the government of the United States, to refuse to employ any person in any capacity, if such person is a citizen and is qualified, on account of the race, color, creed, religion, national origin, or military or veteran status of such person.

Laws 1943, c. 114, § 1, p. 400;

R.S.1943, § 48-215;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 75.

This section prohibits racial discrimination by persons producing or distributing military or naval supplies. Midwest Employers Council, Inc. v. City of Omaha, 177 Neb. 877, 131 N.W.2d 609 (1964).